Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 5. THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP AND THE SUIT AFFECTING THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 108. CENTRAL RECORD FILE; VITAL STATISTICS

Sec. 108.001. TRANSMITTAL OF RECORDS OF SUIT BY CLERK. (a) Except as provided by this chapter, the clerk of the court shall transmit to the vital statistics unit a certified record of the order rendered in a suit, together with the name and all prior names, birth date, and place of birth of the child on a form provided by the unit. The form shall be completed by the petitioner and submitted to the clerk at the time the order is filed for record.

(b) The vital statistics unit shall maintain these records in a central file according to the name, birth date, and place of birth of the child, the court that rendered the order, and the docket number of the suit.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, the records required under this section to be maintained by the vital statistics unit are confidential.

(d) In a Title IV-D case, the Title IV-D agency may transmit the record and information specified by Subsection (a) directly to the vital statistics unit. The record and information are not required to be certified if transmitted by the Title IV-D agency under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1390, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.034, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1727), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 108.002. DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE RECORDS MAINTAINED BY CLERK. A clerk may not transmit to the central record file the pleadings, papers, studies, and records relating to a suit for divorce or annulment or to declare a marriage void.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995.

Sec. 108.003. TRANSMITTAL OF INFORMATION REGARDING ADOPTION. (a) The clerk of a court that renders a decree of adoption shall, not later than the 10th day of the first month after the month in which the adoption is rendered, transmit to the central registry of the vital statistics unit a certified report of adoption that includes:

(1) the name of the adopted child after adoption as shown in the adoption order;

(2) the birth date of the adopted child;

(3) the docket number of the adoption suit;

(4) the identity of the court rendering the adoption;

(5) the date of the adoption order;

(6) the name and address of each parent, guardian, managing conservator, or other person whose consent to adoption was required or waived under Chapter 162, or whose parental rights were terminated in the adoption suit;

(7) the identity of the licensed child placing agency, if any, through which the adopted child was placed for adoption; and

(8) the identity, address, and telephone number of the registry through which the adopted child may register as an adoptee.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, for good cause shown, or on an order of the court that granted the adoption or terminated the proceedings under Section 155.001, the records concerning a child maintained by the district clerk after rendition of a decree of adoption, the records of a child-placing agency that has ceased operations, and the records required under this section to be maintained by the vital statistics unit are confidential, and no person is entitled to access to or information from these records.

(c) If the vital statistics unit determines that a report filed with the unit under this section requires correction, the unit shall mail the report directly to an attorney of record with respect to the adoption. The attorney shall return the corrected report to the unit. If there is no attorney of record, the unit shall mail the report to the clerk of the court for correction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 6.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1390, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1128, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.035, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 108.004. TRANSMITTAL OF FILES ON LOSS OF JURISDICTION. On the loss of jurisdiction of a court under Chapter 155, 159, or 262, the clerk of the court shall transmit to the central registry of the vital statistics unit a certified record, on a form provided by the unit, stating that jurisdiction has been lost, the reason for the loss of jurisdiction, and the name and all previous names, date of birth, and place of birth of the child.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.036, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 108.005. ADOPTION RECORDS RECEIVED BY VITAL STATISTICS UNIT. (a) When the vital statistics unit receives a record from the district clerk showing that continuing, exclusive jurisdiction of a child has been lost due to the adoption of the child, the unit shall close the records concerning that child.

(b) An inquiry concerning a child who has been adopted shall be handled as though the child had not previously been the subject of a suit affecting the parent-child relationship.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1390, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.037, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.038, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 108.006. FEES. (a) The Department of State Health Services may charge a reasonable fee to cover the cost of determining and sending information concerning the identity of the court with continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(b)(7), eff. January 1, 2022.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(b)(7), eff. January 1, 2022.

(d) The receipts from the fees charged under Subsection (a) shall be deposited in a financial institution as determined by the Department of State Health Services and withdrawn as necessary for the sole purpose of operating and maintaining the central record file.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.039, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(b)(7), eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 108.007. MICROFILM. (a) The vital statistics unit may use microfilm or other suitable means for maintaining the central record file.

(b) A certified reproduction of a document maintained by the vital statistics unit is admissible in evidence as the original document.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.040, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 108.008. FILING INFORMATION AFTER DETERMINATION OF PATERNITY. (a) On a determination of paternity, the petitioner shall provide the clerk of the court in which the order was rendered the information necessary to prepare the report of determination of paternity. The clerk shall:

(1) prepare the report on a form provided by the vital statistics unit; and

(2) complete the report immediately after the order becomes final.

(b) On completion of the report, the clerk of the court shall forward to the state registrar a report for each order that became final in that court.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.041, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 108.009. BIRTH CERTIFICATE. (a) The state registrar shall substitute a new birth certificate for the original based on the order in accordance with laws or rules that permit the correction or substitution of a birth certificate for an adopted child or a child whose parents marry each other subsequent to the birth of the child.

(b) The new certificate may not show that the father and child relationship was established after the child's birth but may show the child's actual place and date of birth.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 20, Sec. 1, eff. April 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 2.12, eff. June 14, 2001.

Sec. 108.110. RELEASE OF INFORMATION BY VITAL STATISTICS UNIT. (a) The vital statistics unit shall provide to the Department of Family and Protective Services:

(1) adoption information as necessary for the department to comply with federal law or regulations regarding the compilation or reporting of adoption information to federal officials; and

(2) other information as necessary for the department to administer its duties.

(b) The unit may release otherwise confidential information from the unit's central record files to another governmental entity that has a specific need for the information and maintains appropriate safeguards to prevent further dissemination of the information.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1390, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 1.042, eff. April 2, 2015.